Montana, session 2025, HB510.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Improved customer service -- direction to department -- report to
legislature. (1) To streamline the Montana medicaid program application and renewal process, the department
shall accept:
(a) applications, renewals, recertifications, and periodic reports online and by phone; and
(b) required document submissions electronically, including via upload from a mobile device.
(2) (a) The department shall use text messaging and e-mail to communicate with members and
applicants who provide cell phone numbers and e-mail addresses.
(b) The department shall establish a system to notify members and applicants via text message
and e-mail when verifications are due and when a renewal, recertification, or periodic report is due.
(3) (a) The department shall provide a phone hotline for members and applicants. The hotline may
also be used for other public assistance benefits.
(b) The department shall provide an expected wait time and offer a callback option to each hotline
caller.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 510

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 510.1
(4) The department shall allow a member to submit an online or printed renewal form during a 90-
day reconsideration period if the member's coverage under the Montana medicaid program is terminated for
procedural reasons.
(5) The department shall set a target ex parte renewal rate of no less than 60% of the total
Montana medicaid population by June 30, 2026.
(6) (a) Client-facing technology implemented after [the effective date of this act] must use mobile-
first technology that has optimal functionality on cell phones, tablets, and computers.
(b) The department shall modify existing client-facing technology to mobile-first technology that
has optimal functionality on cell phones, tablets, and computers by June 30, 2026.
(7) All written application notices and application or renewal forms must be:
(a) written in plain language consistent with the requirements of 42 CFR 435.905(b) and 42 CFR
457.110(a); and
(b) translated into the state's five most commonly spoken languages.
(8) The department shall report on a quarterly basis to the children, families, health, and human
services interim committee in accordance with 5-11-210 on issues related to medicaid client service, including:
(a) the total number of applications and renewals;
(b) ex parte renewal success rates, including:
(i) total renewals and percentage by coverage group;
(ii) data sources used;
(iii) monthly compliance with federal requirements; and
(iv) steps the department is taking to reach the target set in subsection (5);
(c) the percentage of applications and the percentage of renewals submitted online, in person, by
mail, and by phone;
(d) the percentage of applications and the percentage of renewals completed within 24 hours, 7
days, 30 days, 45 days, 60 days, and 90 days;
(e) the hotline call volume at the state and county level, including wait times and answer rates; and
(f) the number of individuals whose medicaid-related mail is returned to the department as
undeliverable and the percentage of those individuals whom the department contacted by other means.
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 510

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 510.1
(9) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Ex parte renewal" means a renewal conducted pursuant to 42 CFR 435.916(b)(1).
(b) "Mobile-first technology" means a design approach that starts with a mobile version of a
website or application that is then adapted to a larger screen.
(c) "Procedural reasons" means the state or a medicaid member fails to complete a part of the
renewal process and loss of medicaid coverage for the member occurs.

Section 2. Section 53-2-301, MCA, is amended to read:
"53-2-301. Local offices of public assistance to be established by department. (1) The
department shall establish one or more local offices of public assistance in each county of the state. If
conditions warrant, Subject to the conditions prescribed in subsection (2), two or more counties may be
combined into one administrative unit and the department may use the same local office of public assistance
and staff to administer public assistance in the combined counties.
(2) (a) In accordance with subsection (2)(b), the legislature directs the department to reopen 10
offices of public assistance by June 30, 2026.
(b) When determining the locations of reopened offices, the department shall consider the
following:
(i) the percentage of overall calls into the hotline from residents by county;
(ii) the distance required for individuals in each county to reach an office that is open as of [the
effective date of this act];
(iii) the percentage of individuals enrolled in the Montana medicaid program who are disenrolled at
renewal for procedural reasons, as that term is defined in [section 1], by county; and
(iv) the percentage of individuals who have an initial period of enrollment in medicaid, followed by a
loss of coverage and subsequent reenrollment."

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Appropriation. There is appropriated $3 million from the general fund to
the department of public health and human services in each year of the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for
the purposes of implementing 53-2-301.
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 510

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 510.1

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 53, chapter 6, part 13, and the provisions of Title 53, chapter 6, part 13, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 510